Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2502.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that local governments, like cities and counties, are a critical component of Washington's governing structure. They deliver essential daily services such as law enforcement, roads, bridges, public health, behavioral health, veterans services, building and permitting, and many more, implement state laws at the community level, and act as the government layer closest to the residents and the most responsive to community issues. They form the foundation for effective state policy.(2) For local governments to be successful, they must have adequate funding. Previous reports have highlighted significant local government funding challenges in the state, stemming from state and federal funding cuts, inherent fiscal constraints such as limited property tax revenue growth, and rising costs for services, including labor, public safety, insurance, and inflation, among others. A January 1988 study by the Washington state local governance study commission titled "The Quiet Crisis of Local Governance in Washington" found that, for local governments, "revenues are inadequate for the services they are expected or required to perform." A December 2007 study by the department of community, trade, and economic development titled "County Financial Health and Governance Alternatives" reported that "counties' revenue base has become more inelastic over the last decade, significantly contributing to fiscal distress and jeopardizing equal access across the state to basic services provided by counties." In August 2010 the state treasurer report titled "Local Government Financial Health Indicators" claimed "the financial condition of Washington's local governments has generally declined between 2004 and 2008 based on the selected stress indicators." An August 2014 report by the state auditor titled "Progress Report: Local Government Financial Health" found that "local governments continue to face the fiscally challenging combination of rising costs and constrained revenues that could jeopardize their financial stability long after the state and national economies fully recover."(3) The legislature has considered numerous proposals to address the fiscal distress of local governments since these reports have been published, but no significant policy changes to improve the fiscal health of local governments have been adopted.(4) The joint legislative audit and review committee has identified 111 sales and use tax preferences in the Revised Code of Washington that impact state and local government revenues.(5) It is the intent of the legislature to be careful and prudent when implementing tax preferences. Additionally, the law requires regular review of existing tax preferences to determine if the preference achieves the legislature's objectives, who benefits from the preference, how much the preference costs, and other issues.(6) The average combined sales tax rate in the state is 9.4 percent. The average combined rate includes the state base rate of 6.5 percent and an average local rate of 2.9 percent. While most sales and use tax preferences exempt specific products and services from both state and local taxes, RCW 82.08.985 does not include local sales taxes. Without including an exemption from local sales taxes, payers still receive a significant benefit by saving most of the sales tax. The legislature finds that maintaining the exemption for the state base sales tax rate and not including an exemption for local sales taxes achieves the legislature's objective with certain sales tax preferences.(7) It is the intent of the legislature to improve the fiscal health of local governments by removing the sales tax exemptions for certain products and services and by following the example in RCW 82.08.985 to limit the sales tax exemptions for other specific products and services to only the state portion.Sec. 2. RCW 82.04.050 and 2025 c 422 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) "Sale at retail" or "retail sale" means every sale of tangible personal property (including articles produced, fabricated, or imprinted) to all persons irrespective of the nature of their business and including, among others, without limiting the scope hereof, persons who install, repair, clean, alter, improve, construct, or decorate real or personal property of or for consumers other than a sale to a person who:(i) Purchases for the purpose of resale as tangible personal property in the regular course of business without intervening use by such person, but a purchase for the purpose of resale by a regional transit authority under RCW 81.112.300 is not a sale for resale; or(ii) Installs, repairs, cleans, alters, imprints, improves, constructs, or decorates real or personal property of or for consumers, if such tangible personal property becomes an ingredient or component of such real or personal property without intervening use by such person; or(iii) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased in producing for sale as a new article of tangible personal property or substance, of which such property becomes an ingredient or component or is a chemical used in processing, when the primary purpose of such chemical is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient of a new article being produced for sale; or(iv) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased in producing ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in producing magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of such property is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient of ferrosilicon; or(v) Purchases for the purpose of providing the property to consumers as part of competitive telephone service, as defined in RCW 82.04.065; or(vi) Purchases for the purpose of satisfying the person's obligations under an extended warranty as defined in subsection (7) of this section, if such tangible personal property replaces or becomes an ingredient or component of property covered by the extended warranty without intervening use by such person.(b) The term includes every sale of tangible personal property that is used or consumed or to be used or consumed in the performance of any activity defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" even though such property is resold or used as provided in (a)(i) through (vi) of this subsection following such use.(c) The term also means every sale of tangible personal property to persons engaged in any business that is taxable under RCW 82.04.280(1) (a), (b), and (((g)))(f), 82.04.290, and 82.04.2908.(2) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes the sale of or charge made for tangible personal property consumed and/or for labor and services rendered in respect to the following:(a) The installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, or improving of tangible personal property of or for consumers, including charges made for the mere use of facilities in respect thereto, but excluding charges made for the use of self-service laundry facilities, and also excluding sales of laundry service to nonprofit health care facilities, and excluding services rendered in respect to live animals, birds and insects;(b) The constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or for consumers, including the installing or attaching of any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of installation, and also includes the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of land and the moving of earth excepting the mere leveling of land used in commercial farming or agriculture;(c) The constructing, repairing, or improving of any structure upon, above, or under any real property owned by an owner who conveys the property by title, possession, or any other means to the person performing such construction, repair, or improvement for the purpose of performing such construction, repair, or improvement and the property is then reconveyed by title, possession, or any other means to the original owner;(d) The cleaning, fumigating, razing, or moving of existing buildings or structures, ((but does not include))including the charge made for janitorial services; and for purposes of this section the term "janitorial services" means those cleaning and caretaking services ordinarily performed by commercial janitor service businesses including, but not limited to, wall and window washing, floor cleaning and waxing, and the cleaning in place of rugs, drapes and upholstery. The term "janitorial services" does not include painting, papering, repairing, furnace or septic tank cleaning, snow removal or sandblasting;(e) Automobile towing and similar automotive transportation services, but not in respect to those required to report and pay taxes under chapter 82.16 RCW;(f) The furnishing of lodging and all other services by a hotel, rooming house, tourist court, motel, trailer camp, and the granting of any similar license to use real property, as distinguished from the renting or leasing of real property, and it is presumed that the occupancy of real property for a continuous period of one month or more constitutes a rental or lease of real property and not a mere license to use or enjoy the same. For the purposes of this subsection, it is presumed that the sale of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging for a continuous period of one month or more to a person is a rental or lease of real property and not a mere license to enjoy the same. For the purposes of this section, it is presumed that the sale of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging offered regularly for public occupancy for periods of less than a month constitutes a license to use or enjoy the property subject to sales and use tax and not a rental or lease of property;(g) The installing, repairing, altering, or improving of digital goods for consumers;(h) Persons taxable under (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), and (g) of this subsection when such sales or charges are for property, labor and services which are used or consumed in whole or in part by such persons in the performance of any activity defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" even though such property, labor and services may be resold after such use or consumption. Nothing contained in this subsection may be construed to modify subsection (1) of this section and nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section may be construed to modify this subsection.(3) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes the sale of or charge made for personal, business, or professional services including amounts designated as interest, rents, fees, admission, and other service emoluments however designated, received by persons engaging in the following business activities:(a) Abstract, title insurance, and escrow services;(b) Credit bureau services;(c) Automobile parking and storage garage services;(d) Landscape maintenance and horticultural services but excluding (i) horticultural services provided to farmers and (ii) pruning, trimming, repairing, removing, and clearing of trees and brush near electric transmission or distribution lines or equipment, if performed by or at the direction of an electric utility;(e) Service charges associated with tickets to professional sporting events;(f) The following personal services: Tanning salon services, tattoo parlor services, steam bath services, turkish bath services, escort services, and dating services;(g) Information technology training services, technical support, and other services including, but not limited to, assisting with network operations and support, help desk services, in-person training related to hardware or software, network system support services, data entry services, and data processing services;(h) Custom website development services. For the purposes of this subsection (3), "website development services" means the design, development, and support of a website provided by a website developer to a customer;(i) Investigation, security services, security monitoring services, and armored car services including, but not limited to, background checks, security guard and patrol services, personal and event security, armored car transportation of cash and valuables, and security system services and monitoring. This does not include locksmith services;(j) Temporary staffing services. For the purposes of this subsection (3), "temporary staffing services" means providing workers to other businesses, except for hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 or 71.12 RCW, for limited periods of time to supplement their workforce and fill employment vacancies on a contract or for fee basis;(k) Advertising services. (i) For the purposes of this subsection (3), "advertising services" means all digital and nondigital services related to the creation, preparation, production, or dissemination of advertisements including, but not limited to:(A) Layout, art direction, graphic design, mechanical preparation, production supervision, placement, referrals, acquisition of advertising space, and rendering advice concerning the best methods of advertising products or services; and(B) Online referrals, search engine marketing((,)) and lead generation optimization, web campaign planning, the acquisition of advertising space in the internet media, and the monitoring and evaluation of website traffic for purposes of determining the effectiveness of an advertising campaign.(ii) "Advertising services" do not include:(A) Web hosting services and domain name registration;(B) Services rendered in respect to the following:(I) "Newspapers" as defined in RCW 82.04.214;(II) Printing or publishing under RCW 82.04.280; and(III) "Radio and television broadcasting" within this state as defined in RCW 82.04.281; and(C) Services rendered in respect to out-of-home advertising, including: Billboard advertising; street furniture advertising; transit advertising; place-based advertising, such as in-store display advertising or point-of-sale advertising; dynamic or static signage at live events; naming rights; and fixed signage advertising. Out-of-home advertising does not include direct mail;(l) Live presentations including, but not limited to, lectures, seminars, workshops, or courses where participants attend either in-person or via the internet or telecommunications equipment that allows audience members and the presenter or instructor to give, receive, and discuss information with each other in real time; and(m)(i) Operating an athletic or fitness facility, including all charges for the use of such a facility or for any associated services and amenities, except as provided in (m)(ii) of this subsection.(ii) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in (m)(i) of this subsection (3), the term "sale at retail" and "retail sale" under this subsection does not include:(A) Separately stated charges for the use of an athletic or fitness facility where such use is primarily for a purpose other than engaging in or receiving instruction in a physical fitness activity;(B) Separately stated charges for the use of a discrete portion of an athletic or fitness facility, other than a pool, where such discrete portion of the facility does not by itself meet the definition of "athletic or fitness facility" in this subsection;(C) Separately stated charges for services, such as massage, nutritional consulting, and body composition testing, that do not require the customer to engage in physical fitness activities to receive the service. The exclusion in this subsection (3)(m)(ii)(C) does not apply to personal training services and instruction in a physical fitness activity;(D) Separately stated charges for physical therapy provided by a physical therapist, as those terms are defined in RCW 18.74.010, or occupational therapy provided by an occupational therapy practitioner, as those terms are defined in RCW 18.59.020, when performed pursuant to a referral from an authorized health care practitioner or in consultation with an authorized health care practitioner. For the purposes of this subsection (3)(m)(ii)(D), an authorized health care practitioner means a health care practitioner licensed under chapter 18.83, 18.25, 18.36A, 18.57, 18.71, or 18.71A RCW, or, until July 1, 2022, chapter 18.57A RCW;(E) Rent or association fees charged by a landlord or residential association to a tenant or residential owner with access to an athletic or fitness facility maintained by the landlord or residential association, unless the rent or fee varies depending on whether the tenant or owner has access to the facility;(F) Services provided in the regular course of employment by an employee with access to an athletic or fitness facility maintained by the employer for use without charge by its employees or their family members;(G) The provision of access to an athletic or fitness facility by an educational institution to its students and staff. However, charges made by an educational institution to its alumni or other members of the public for the use of any of the educational institution's athletic or fitness facilities are a retail sale under this subsection (3)(m). For purposes of this subsection (3)(m)(ii)(G), "educational institution" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.170;(H) Yoga, chi gong, or martial arts classes, training, or events held at a community center, park, school gymnasium, college or university, hospital or other medical facility, private residence, or any other facility that is not operated within and as part of an athletic or fitness facility.(iii) Nothing in (m)(ii) of this subsection (3) may be construed to affect the taxation of sales made by the operator of an athletic or fitness facility, where such sales are defined as a retail sale under any provision of this section other than this subsection (3).(iv) For the purposes of this subsection (3)(m), the following definitions apply:(A) "Athletic or fitness facility" means an indoor or outdoor facility or portion of a facility that is primarily used for: Exercise classes; strength and conditioning programs; personal training services; tennis, racquetball, handball, squash, or pickleball; or other activities requiring the use of exercise or strength training equipment, such as treadmills, elliptical machines, stair climbers, stationary cycles, rowing machines, pilates equipment, balls, climbing ropes, jump ropes, and weightlifting equipment.(B) "Martial arts" means any of the various systems of training for physical combat or self-defense. "Martial arts" includes, but is not limited to, karate, kung fu, tae kwon do, Krav Maga, boxing, kickboxing, jujitsu, shootfighting, wrestling, aikido, judo, hapkido, Kendo, tai chi, and mixed martial arts.(C) "Physical fitness activities" means activities that involve physical exertion for the purpose of improving or maintaining the general fitness, strength, flexibility, conditioning, or health of the participant. "Physical fitness activities" includes participating in yoga, chi gong, or martial arts.For the purposes of (g) through (i) and (k) of this subsection (3), the terms "sale at retail" and "retail sale" do not include a sale between members of an affiliated group as defined in RCW 82.04.299(1)(f).(4)(a) The term also includes the renting or leasing of tangible personal property to consumers.(b) The term does not include the renting or leasing of tangible personal property where the lease or rental is for the purpose of sublease or subrent.(5) The term also includes the providing of "competitive telephone service," "telecommunications service," or "ancillary services," as those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.065, to consumers.(6)(a) The term also includes the sale of prewritten computer software, custom software, and customization of prewritten computer software to a consumer, regardless of the method of delivery to the end user. For purposes of this subsection (6)(a), the sale of prewritten computer software includes the sale of or charge made for a key or an enabling or activation code, where the key or code is required to activate prewritten computer software and put the software into use. There is no separate sale of the key or code from the prewritten computer software, regardless of how the sale may be characterized by the vendor or by the purchaser.(b)(i) The term also includes the charge made to consumers for the right to access and use prewritten computer software, custom software, and customization of prewritten computer software, where possession of the software is maintained by the seller or a third party, regardless of whether the charge for the service is on a per use, per user, per license, subscription, or some other basis.(ii)(A) The service described in (b)(i) of this subsection (6) includes the right to access and use prewritten computer software, custom software, and customization of prewritten computer software to perform data processing.(B) For purposes of this subsection (6)(b)(ii), "data processing" means the systematic performance of operations on data to extract the required information in an appropriate form or to convert the data to usable information. Data processing includes check processing, image processing, form processing, survey processing, payroll processing, claim processing, and similar activities.(7) The term also includes the sale of or charge made for an extended warranty to a consumer. For purposes of this subsection, "extended warranty" means an agreement for a specified duration to perform the replacement or repair of tangible personal property at no additional charge or a reduced charge for tangible personal property, labor, or both, or to provide indemnification for the replacement or repair of tangible personal property, based on the occurrence of specified events. The term "extended warranty" does not include an agreement, otherwise meeting the definition of extended warranty in this subsection, if no separate charge is made for the agreement and the value of the agreement is included in the sales price of the tangible personal property covered by the agreement. For purposes of this subsection, "sales price" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.010.(8)(a) The term also includes the following sales to consumers of digital goods, digital codes, and digital automated services:(i) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser the right of permanent use;(ii) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser a right of use that is less than permanent;(iii) Sales in which the purchaser is not obligated to make continued payment as a condition of the sale; and(iv) Sales in which the purchaser is obligated to make continued payment as a condition of the sale.(b) A retail sale of digital goods, digital codes, or digital automated services under this subsection (8) includes any services provided by the seller exclusively in connection with the digital goods, digital codes, or digital automated services, whether or not a separate charge is made for such services.(c) A retail sale of digital goods, digital codes, or digital automated services does not include the following services if the sale occurs between members of an affiliated group as defined in RCW 82.04.299(1)(f):(i) Any service that primarily involves the application of human effort by the seller, and the human effort originated after the customer requested the service;(ii) Live presentations, such as lectures, seminars, workshops, or courses, where participants are connected to other participants via the internet or telecommunications equipment, which allows audience members and the presenter or instructor to give, receive, and discuss information with each other in real time;(iii) Advertising services. For purposes of this subsection (8)(c), "advertising services" means all services directly related to the creation, preparation, production, or dissemination of advertisements. Advertising services include layout, art direction, graphic design, mechanical preparation, production supervision, placement, and rendering advice to a client concerning the best methods of advertising that client's products or services. Advertising services also include online referrals, search engine marketing and lead generation optimization, web campaign planning, the acquisition of advertising space in the internet media, and the monitoring and evaluation of website traffic for purposes of determining the effectiveness of an advertising campaign. Advertising services do not include web hosting services and domain name registration; and(iv) Data processing services. For purposes of this subsection (8)(c), "data processing service" means a primarily automated service provided to a business or other organization where the primary object of the service is the systematic performance of operations by the service provider on data supplied in whole or in part by the customer to extract the required information in an appropriate form or to convert the data to usable information. Data processing services include check processing, image processing, form processing, survey processing, payroll processing, claim processing, and similar activities. Data processing does not include the service described in subsection (6)(b) of this section.(d) For purposes of this subsection, "permanent" means perpetual or for an indefinite or unspecified length of time. A right of permanent use is presumed to have been granted unless the agreement between the seller and the purchaser specifies or the circumstances surrounding the transaction suggest or indicate that the right to use terminates on the occurrence of a condition subsequent.(9) The term also includes the charge made for providing tangible personal property along with an operator for a fixed or indeterminate period of time. A consideration of this is that the operator is necessary for the tangible personal property to perform as designed. For the purpose of this subsection (9), an operator must do more than maintain, inspect, or set up the tangible personal property.(10) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in respect to the building, repairing, or improving of any street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation or political subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is used or to be used primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any kind.(11) The term also does not include sales of chemical sprays or washes to persons for the purpose of postharvest treatment of fruit for the prevention of scald, fungus, mold, or decay, nor does it include sales of feed, seed, seedlings, fertilizer, agents for enhanced pollination including insects such as bees, and spray materials to: (a) Persons who participate in the federal conservation reserve program, the environmental quality incentives program, the wetlands reserve program, and the wildlife habitat incentives program, or their successors administered by the United States department of agriculture; (b) farmers for the purpose of producing for sale any agricultural product; (c) farmers for the purpose of providing bee pollination services; and (d) farmers acting under cooperative habitat development or access contracts with an organization exempt from federal income tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code or the Washington state department of fish and wildlife to produce or improve wildlife habitat on land that the farmer owns or leases.(12) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in respect to the constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the installing, or attaching of any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of installation. Nor does the term include the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of land and the moving of earth of or for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority. Nor does the term include the sale of services or charges made for cleaning up for the United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste and other by-products of weapons production and nuclear research and development.(13) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for labor, services, or tangible personal property pursuant to agreements providing maintenance services for bus, rail, or rail fixed guideway equipment when a regional transit authority is the recipient of the labor, services, or tangible personal property, and a transit agency, as defined in RCW 81.104.015, performs the labor or services.(14) The term does not include the sale for resale of any service described in this section if the sale would otherwise constitute a "sale at retail" and "retail sale" under this section.(15)(a) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes amounts charged, however labeled, to consumers to engage in any of the activities listed in this subsection (15)(a), including the furnishing of any associated equipment or, except as otherwise provided in this subsection, providing instruction in such activities, where such charges are not otherwise defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" in this section:(i)(A) Golf, including any variant in which either golf balls or golf clubs are used, such as miniature golf, hitting golf balls at a driving range, and golf simulators, and including fees charged by a golf course to a player for using his or her own cart. However, charges for golf instruction are not a retail sale, provided that if the instruction involves the use of a golfing facility that would otherwise require the payment of a fee, such as green fees or driving range fees, such fees, including the applicable retail sales tax, must be separately identified and charged by the golfing facility operator to the instructor or the person receiving the instruction.(B) Notwithstanding (a)(i)(A) of this subsection (15) and except as otherwise provided in this subsection (15)(a)(i)(B), the term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" does not include amounts charged to participate in, or conduct, a golf tournament or other competitive event. However, amounts paid by event participants to the golf facility operator are retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(i). Likewise, amounts paid by the event organizer to the golf facility are retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(i), if such amounts vary based on the number of event participants;(ii) Ballooning, hang gliding, indoor or outdoor sky diving, paragliding, parasailing, and similar activities;(iii) Air hockey, billiards, pool, foosball, darts, shuffleboard, ping pong, and similar games;(iv) Access to amusement park, theme park, and water park facilities, including but not limited to charges for admission and locker or cabana rentals. Discrete charges for rides or other attractions or entertainment that are in addition to the charge for admission are not a retail sale under this subsection (15)(a)(iv). For the purposes of this subsection, an amusement park or theme park is a location that provides permanently affixed amusement rides, games, and other entertainment, but does not include parks or zoos for which the primary purpose is the exhibition of wildlife, or fairs, carnivals, and festivals as defined in (b)(i) of this subsection;(v) Batting cage activities;(vi) Bowling, but not including competitive events, except that amounts paid by the event participants to the bowling alley operator are retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(vi). Likewise, amounts paid by the event organizer to the operator of the bowling alley are retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(vi), if such amounts vary based on the number of event participants;(vii) Climbing on artificial climbing structures, whether indoors or outdoors;(viii) Day trips for sightseeing purposes;(ix) Bungee jumping, zip lining, and riding inside a ball, whether inflatable or otherwise;(x) Horseback riding offered to the public, where the seller furnishes the horse to the buyer and providing instruction is not the primary focus of the activity, including guided rides, but not including therapeutic horseback riding provided by an instructor certified by a nonprofit organization that offers national or international certification for therapeutic riding instructors;(xi) Fishing, including providing access to private fishing areas and charter or guided fishing, except that fishing contests and license fees imposed by a government entity are not a retail sale under this subsection;(xii) Guided hunting and hunting at game farms and shooting preserves, except that hunting contests and license fees imposed by a government entity are not a retail sale under this subsection;(xiii) Swimming, but only in respect to (A) recreational or fitness swimming that is open to the public, such as open swim, lap swimming, and special events like kids night out and pool parties during open swim time, and (B) pool parties for private events, such as birthdays, family gatherings, and employee outings. Fees for swimming lessons, to participate in swim meets and other competitions, or to join a swim team, club, or aquatic facility are not retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(xiii);(xiv) Go-karting, bumper cars, and other motorized activities where the seller provides the vehicle and the premises where the buyer will operate the vehicle;(xv) Indoor or outdoor playground activities, such as inflatable bounce structures and other inflatables; mazes; trampolines; slides; ball pits; games of tag, including laser tag and soft-dart tag; and human gyroscope rides, regardless of whether such activities occur at the seller's place of business, but not including playground activities provided for children by a licensed child day care center or licensed family day care provider as those terms are defined in RCW 43.216.010;(xvi) Shooting sports and activities, such as target shooting, skeet, trap, sporting clays, "5" stand, and archery, but only in respect to discrete charges to members of the public to engage in these activities, but not including fees to enter a competitive event, instruction that is entirely or predominately classroom based, or to join or renew a membership at a club, range, or other facility;(xvii) Paintball and airsoft activities;(xviii) Skating, including ice skating, roller skating, and inline skating, but only in respect to discrete charges to members of the public to engage in skating activities, but not including skating lessons, competitive events, team activities, or fees to join or renew a membership at a skating facility, club, or other organization;(xix) Nonmotorized snow sports and activities, such as downhill and cross-country skiing, snowboarding, ski jumping, sledding, snow tubing, snowshoeing, and similar snow sports and activities, whether engaged in outdoors or in an indoor facility with or without snow, but only in respect to discrete charges to the public for the use of land or facilities to engage in nonmotorized snow sports and activities, such as fees, however labeled, for the use of ski lifts and tows and daily or season passes for access to trails or other areas where nonmotorized snow sports and activities are conducted. However, fees for the following are not retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(xix): (A) Instructional lessons; (B) permits issued by a governmental entity to park a vehicle on or access public lands; and (C) permits or leases granted by an owner of private timberland for recreational access to areas used primarily for growing and harvesting timber; and(xx) Scuba diving; snorkeling; river rafting; surfing; kiteboarding; flyboarding; water slides; inflatables, such as water pillows, water trampolines, and water rollers; and similar water sports and activities.(b) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this subsection (15), the term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" does not include charges:(i) Made for admission to, and rides or attractions at, fairs, carnivals, and festivals. For the purposes of this subsection, fairs, carnivals, and festivals are events that do not exceed 21 days and a majority of the amusement rides, if any, are not affixed to real property;(ii) Made by an educational institution to its students and staff for activities defined as retail sales by (a)(i) through (xx) of this subsection. However, charges made by an educational institution to its alumni or other members of the general public for these activities are a retail sale under this subsection (15). For purposes of this subsection (15)(b)(ii), "educational institution" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.170;(iii) Made by a vocational school for commercial diver training that is licensed by the workforce training and education coordinating board under chapter 28C.10 RCW; or(iv) Made for day camps offered by a nonprofit organization or state or local governmental entity that provide youth not older than age 18, or that are focused on providing individuals with disabilities or mental illness, the opportunity to participate in a variety of supervised activities.(16)(a) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes the purchase or acquisition of tangible personal property and specified services by a person who receives either a qualifying grant exempt from tax under RCW 82.04.767 or 82.16.320 or a grant deductible under RCW 82.04.4339, except for transactions excluded from the definition of "sale at retail" or "retail sale" by any other provision of this section. Nothing in this subsection (16) may be construed to limit the application of any other provision of this section to purchases by a recipient of either a qualifying grant exempt from tax under RCW 82.04.767 or a grant deductible under RCW 82.04.4339, or by any other person.(b) For purposes of this subsection (16), "specified services" means:(i) The constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property, including the installing or attaching of any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of installation;(ii) The clearing of land or the moving of earth, whether or not associated with activities described in (b)(i) of this subsection (16);(iii) The razing or moving of existing buildings or structures; and(iv) Landscape maintenance and horticultural services.Sec. 3. RCW 82.08.0205 and 2008 c 237 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of waste vegetable oil that is used by a person in the production of biodiesel for personal use.(b) The exemption provided in (a) of this subsection does not apply to a sales and use tax imposed by a local government under the authority of chapter 82.14 or 81.104 RCW.(2) This exemption is available only if the buyer provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department.(3) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(a) "Waste vegetable oil" means used cooking oil gathered from restaurants or commercial food processors; and(b) "Personal use" means the person does not engage in the business of selling biodiesel at wholesale or retail.Sec. 4. RCW 82.12.0205 and 2008 c 237 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use of waste vegetable oil that is used by a person in the production of biodiesel for personal use. However, the exemption provided in this section does not apply to a sales and use tax imposed by a local government under the authority of chapter 82.14 or 81.104 RCW. The definitions in RCW 82.08.0205 apply to this section.Sec. 5. RCW 82.08.0315 and 1997 c 61 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) As used in this section:(a) "Production equipment" means the following when used in motion picture or video production or postproduction: Grip and lighting equipment, cameras, camera mounts including tripods, jib arms, steadicams, and other camera mounts, cranes, dollies, generators, helicopter mounts, helicopters rented for motion picture or video production, walkie talkies, vans, trucks, and other vehicles specifically equipped for motion picture or video production or used solely for production activities, wardrobe and makeup trailers, special effects and stunt equipment, video assists, videotape recorders, cables and connectors, ((telepromoters [teleprompters]))teleprompters, sound recording equipment, and editorial equipment.(b) "Production services" means motion picture and video processing, printing, editing, duplicating, animation, graphics, special effects, negative cutting, conversions to other formats or media, stock footage, sound mixing, rerecording, sound sweetening, sound looping, sound effects, and automatic dialog replacement.(c) "Motion picture or video production business" means a person engaged in the production of motion pictures and videotapes for exhibition, sale, or for broadcast by a person other than the person producing the motion picture or videotape.(2)(a) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the rental of production equipment, or the sale of production services, to a motion picture or video production business.(b) The exemption provided in (a) of this subsection does not apply to a sales and use tax imposed by a local government under the authority of chapter 82.14 or 81.104 RCW.(3) The exemption provided for in this section shall not apply to rental of production equipment, or the sale of production services, to a motion picture or video production business that is engaged, to any degree, in the production of erotic material, as defined in RCW 9.68.050.(4) In order to claim an exemption under this section, the purchaser must provide the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The seller shall retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.Sec. 6. RCW 82.12.0315 and 2009 c 535 s 614 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to the use of:(a) Production equipment rented to a motion picture or video production business;(b) Production equipment acquired and used by a motion picture or video production business in another state, if the acquisition and use occurred more than ninety days before the time the motion picture or video production business entered this state; and(c) Production services that are within the scope of RCW 82.04.050(2) (a) or (g) and are sold to a motion picture or video production business.(2) The exemption provided in subsection (1)(a) through (c) of this section does not apply to a sales and use tax imposed by a local government under the authority of chapter 82.14 or 81.104 RCW.(3) As used in this section, "production equipment," "production services," and "motion picture or video production business" have the meanings given in RCW 82.08.0315.(((3)))(4) The exemption provided for in this section shall not apply to the use of production equipment rented to, or production equipment or production services that are within the scope of RCW 82.04.050(2) (a) or (g) acquired and used by, a motion picture or video production business that is engaged, to any degree, in the production of erotic material, as defined in RCW 9.68.050.Sec. 7. RCW 82.08.806 and 2023 c 286 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales, to a printer or publisher, of computer equipment, including repair parts and replacement parts for such equipment, when the computer equipment is used primarily in the printing or publishing of any printed material, or to sales of or charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the computer equipment. This exemption applies only to computer equipment not otherwise exempt under RCW 82.08.02565.(b) The exemption provided in (a) of this subsection does not apply to a sales and use tax imposed by a local government under the authority of chapter 82.14 or 81.104 RCW.(2) A person taking the exemption under this section must keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this section. This exemption is available only when the purchaser provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.(3) The definitions in this subsection (3) apply throughout this section, unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(a) "Computer" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.215.(b) "Computer equipment" means a computer and the associated physical components that constitute a computer system, including monitors, keyboards, printers, modems, scanners, pointing devices, and other computer peripheral equipment, cables, servers, and routers. "Computer equipment" also includes digital cameras and computer software.(c) "Computer software" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.215.(d) "Primarily" means greater than fifty percent as measured by time.(e) "Printer or publisher" means a person, as defined in RCW 82.04.030, who is subject to tax under RCW 82.04.280(1)(a) or is eligible for the exemption under RCW 82.04.759.(4) "Computer equipment" does not include computer equipment that is used primarily for administrative purposes including but not limited to payroll processing, accounting, customer service, telemarketing, and collection. If computer equipment is used simultaneously for administrative and nonadministrative purposes, the administrative use must be disregarded during the period of simultaneous use for purposes of determining whether the computer equipment is used primarily for administrative purposes.Sec. 8. RCW 82.08.806 and 2020 c 139 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales, to a printer or publisher, of computer equipment, including repair parts and replacement parts for such equipment, when the computer equipment is used primarily in the printing or publishing of any printed material, or to sales of or charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the computer equipment. This exemption applies only to computer equipment not otherwise exempt under RCW 82.08.02565.(b) The exemption provided in (a) of this subsection does not apply to a sales and use tax imposed by a local government under the authority of chapter 82.14 or 81.104 RCW.(2) A person taking the exemption under this section must keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this section. This exemption is available only when the purchaser provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.(3) The definitions in this subsection (3) apply throughout this section, unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(a) "Computer" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.215.(b) "Computer equipment" means a computer and the associated physical components that constitute a computer system, including monitors, keyboards, printers, modems, scanners, pointing devices, and other computer peripheral equipment, cables, servers, and routers. "Computer equipment" also includes digital cameras and computer software.(c) "Computer software" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.215.(d) "Primarily" means greater than fifty percent as measured by time.(e) "Printer or publisher" means a person, as defined in RCW 82.04.030, who is subject to tax under RCW 82.04.260(14) or 82.04.280(1)(a).(4) "Computer equipment" does not include computer equipment that is used primarily for administrative purposes including but not limited to payroll processing, accounting, customer service, telemarketing, and collection. If computer equipment is used simultaneously for administrative and nonadministrative purposes, the administrative use must be disregarded during the period of simultaneous use for purposes of determining whether the computer equipment is used primarily for administrative purposes.Sec. 9. RCW 82.12.806 and 2004 c 8 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use, by a printer or publisher, of computer equipment, including repair parts and replacement parts for such equipment, when the computer equipment is used primarily in the printing or publishing of any printed material, or to labor and services rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the computer equipment. This exemption applies only to computer equipment not otherwise exempt under RCW 82.12.02565.(b) The exemption provided in (a) of this subsection does not apply to a sales and use tax imposed by a local government under the authority of chapter 82.14 or 81.104 RCW.(2) For the purposes of this section, the definitions in RCW 82.08.806 apply.Sec. 10. RCW 82.08.807 and 2005 c 514 s 115 are each amended to read as follows:The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to delivery charges made for the delivery of direct mail if the charges are separately stated on an invoice or similar billing document given to the purchaser. However, the exemption provided in this section does not apply to a sales and use tax imposed by a local government under the authority of chapter 82.14 or 81.104 RCW.Sec. 11. RCW 82.12.807 and 2005 c 514 s 116 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) The tax levied by this chapter does not apply to the value of delivery charges made for the delivery of direct mail if the charges are separately stated on an invoice or similar billing document given to the purchaser.(b) The exemption provided in (a) of this subsection does not apply to a sales and use tax imposed by a local government under the authority of chapter 82.14 or 81.104 RCW.(2) "Delivery charges" and "direct mail" have the same meanings as in RCW 82.08.010.Sec. 12. RCW 82.08.832 and 1998 c 178 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of gun safes.(b) The exemption provided in (a) of this subsection does not apply to a sales and use tax imposed by a local government under the authority of chapter 82.14 or 81.104 RCW.(2) As used in this section and RCW 82.12.832, "gun safe" means an enclosure specifically designed or modified for the purpose of storing a firearm and equipped with a padlock, key lock, combination lock, or similar locking device which, when locked, prevents the unauthorized use of the firearm.Sec. 13. RCW 82.12.832 and 1998 c 178 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use of gun safes as defined in RCW 82.08.832. However, the exemption provided in this section does not apply to a sales and use tax imposed by a local government under the authority of chapter 82.14 or 81.104 RCW.Sec. 14. RCW 82.08.900 and 2018 c 164 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to an eligible person:(a) In respect to equipment necessary to process biogas from a landfill into marketable coproducts, including but not limited to biogas conditioning, compression, and electrical generation equipment, or to services rendered in respect to installing, constructing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving equipment necessary to process biogas from a landfill into marketable coproducts; and(b) Establishing or operating an anaerobic digester or to services rendered in respect to installing, constructing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving an anaerobic digester, or to sales of tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient or component of the anaerobic digester.(2) The exemption provided in subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section does not apply to a sales and use tax imposed by a local government under the authority of chapter 82.14 or 81.104 RCW.(3) A person claiming an exemption under this section must keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this section. Sellers may make tax exempt sales under this section only if the buyer provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.(((3)))(4) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section and RCW 82.12.900 unless the context clearly requires otherwise:(a) "Anaerobic digester" means a facility that processes organic material into biogas and digestate using microorganisms in a decomposition process within a closed, oxygen-free container as well as the equipment necessary to process biogas or digestate produced by an anaerobic digester into marketable coproducts, including but not limited to biogas conditioning, compression, nutrient recovery, and electrical generation equipment.(b) "Eligible person" means any person establishing or operating an anaerobic digester or landfill or processing biogas from an anaerobic digester or landfill into marketable coproducts.Sec. 15. RCW 82.12.900 and 2018 c 164 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to:(1) Equipment necessary to process biogas from a landfill into marketable coproducts, including but not limited to biogas conditioning, compression, and electrical generation equipment, or to services rendered in respect to installing, constructing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving equipment necessary to process biogas from a landfill into marketable coproducts; and(2) The use of anaerobic digesters, tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient or component of anaerobic digesters, or the use of services rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving eligible tangible personal property by an eligible person establishing or operating an anaerobic digester, as defined in RCW 82.08.900.(3) The exemption provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section do not apply to a sales and use tax imposed by a local government under the authority of chapter 82.14 or 81.104 RCW.Sec. 16. RCW 82.08.962 and 2019 c 288 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Subject to the requirements of this section, the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of machinery and equipment used directly in generating electricity using fuel cells, wind, sun, biomass energy, tidal or wave energy, geothermal resources, or technology that converts otherwise lost energy from exhaust, as the principal source of power, or to sales of or charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to installing such machinery and equipment, but only if the purchaser develops with such machinery, equipment, and labor a facility capable of generating not less than one thousand watts AC of electricity. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the purchaser must pay the state and local sales tax on such sales and apply to the department for a remittance of the tax paid.(b) ((Beginning on July 1, 2011, through December 31, 2019, the amount of the exemption under this subsection (1)(b) is equal to seventy-five percent of the state and local sales tax paid. The purchaser is eligible for an exemption under this subsection (1)(b) in the form of a remittance.))The exemption provided in (a) of this subsection does not apply to a sales and use tax imposed by a local government under the authority of chapter 82.14 or 81.104 RCW.(c) Beginning January 1, 2020, through December 31, 2029, the purchaser is entitled to an exemption, in the form of a remittance, under this subsection (1)(c) in an amount equal to:(i) Fifty percent of the state ((and local)) sales tax paid, if:(A) The exempt purchase is for machinery and equipment or labor and services rendered in respect to installing such machinery and equipment in (a) of this subsection, excluding qualified purchases under subsection (c)(i)(B) of this subsection, and the department of labor and industries certifies that the project includes: Procurement from and contracts with women, minority, or veteran-owned businesses; procurement from and contracts with entities that have a history of complying with federal and state wage and hour laws and regulations; apprenticeship utilization; and preferred entry for workers living in the area where the project is being constructed. In the event that a project is built without one or more of these standards, and a project developer or its designated principal contractor demonstrates that it has made all good faith efforts to meet the standards but was unable to comply due to lack of availability of qualified businesses or local hires, the department of labor and industries may certify that the developer complied with that standard; or(B) The exempt purchase is for machinery and equipment that is used directly in the generation of electricity by a solar energy system capable of generating more than one hundred kilowatts AC but no more than five hundred kilowatts AC of electricity, and labor and services rendered in respect to installing such machinery and equipment, and the department of labor and industries certifies that the project has met the requirements of (c)(i)(A) of this subsection, and the purchaser provides the following documentation to the department as part of the application for a remittance:(I) A copy of the contractor's certificate of registration in compliance with chapter 18.27 RCW;(II) The contractor's current state unified business identifier number;(III) A copy of the contractor's proof of industrial insurance coverage for the contractor's employees working in Washington as required in Title 51 RCW; employment security department number as required in Title 50 RCW; and a state excise tax registration number as required in ((Title 82 RCW))this title; and(IV) Documentation of the contractor's history of compliance with federal and state wage and hour laws and regulations, consistent with (e)(ii)(D) of this subsection;(ii) Seventy-five percent of the state ((and local)) sales tax paid, if the department of labor and industries certifies that the project complies with (c)(i)(A) and (B) of this subsection and compensates workers at prevailing wage rates determined by local collective bargaining as determined by the department of labor and industries. This subsection (1)(c)(ii) does not apply with respect to solar energy systems described in (c)(i)(B) of this subsection; or(iii) One hundred percent of the state ((and local)) sales tax paid, if the department of labor and industries certifies that the project is developed under a community workforce agreement or project labor agreement. This subsection (1)(c)(iii) does not apply with respect to solar energy systems described in (c)(i)(B) of this subsection.(d) In order to qualify for the remittance under (c) of this subsection, installation of the qualifying machinery and equipment must commence no earlier than January 1, 2020, and be completed by December 31, 2029.(e) Beginning July 1, 2019, and through December 31, 2029, the purchaser is entitled to an exemption under this subsection (1)(e) in an amount equal to one hundred percent of the state ((and local)) sales tax due on:(i) Machinery and equipment that is used directly in the generation of electricity by a solar energy system that is capable of generating no more than one hundred kilowatts AC of electricity; or(ii) Labor and services rendered in respect to installing machinery and equipment exempt under (e)(i) of this subsection, and the seller meets the following requirements at the time of the sale for which the exemption is claimed:(A) Has obtained a certificate of registration in compliance with chapter 18.27 RCW;(B) Has obtained a current state unified business identifier number;(C) Possesses proof of industrial insurance coverage for the contractor's employees working in Washington as required in Title 51 RCW; employment security department number as required in Title 50 RCW; and a state excise tax registration number as required in ((Title 82 RCW))this title; and(D) Has had no findings of violation of federal or state wage and hour laws and regulations in a final and binding order by an administrative agency or court of competent jurisdiction in the past twenty-four months.(f) Purchasers claiming an exemption under (e) of this subsection must provide the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department.(g) In order to qualify for the exemption under (e)(ii) of this subsection, installation of the qualifying machinery and equipment must commence no earlier than July 1, 2019, and be completed by December 31, 2029.(2)(a) The department of labor and industries must adopt emergency and permanent rules to:(i) Define and set minimum requirements for all labor standards identified in subsection (1)(c) of this section; and(ii) Set requirements for all good faith efforts under subsection (1)(c)(i) and (ii) of this section, as well as documentation requirements and a certification process. Requirements for all good faith efforts must be designed to maximize the likelihood that the project is completed with said standards and could include: Proactive outreach to firms that are women, minority, and veteran-owned businesses; advertising in local community publications and publications appropriate to identified firms; participating in community job fairs, conferences, and trade shows; and other measures. The certification process and timeline must be designed to prevent undue delay to project development.(b) Emergency rules must be adopted by December 1, 2019, and take effect January 1, 2020.(3) For purposes of this section and RCW 82.12.962, the following definitions apply:(a) "Biomass energy" includes: (i) By-products of pulping and wood manufacturing process; (ii) animal waste; (iii) solid organic fuels from wood; (iv) forest or field residues; (v) wooden demolition or construction debris; (vi) food waste; (vii) liquors derived from algae and other sources; (viii) dedicated energy crops; (ix) biosolids; and (x) yard waste. "Biomass energy" does not include wood pieces that have been treated with chemical preservatives such as creosote, pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic; wood from old growth forests; or municipal solid waste.(b) "Fuel cell" means an electrochemical reaction that generates electricity by combining atoms of hydrogen and oxygen in the presence of a catalyst.(c)(i) "Machinery and equipment" means fixtures, devices, and support facilities that are integral and necessary to the generation of electricity using fuel cells, wind, sun, biomass energy, tidal or wave energy, geothermal resources, or technology that converts otherwise lost energy from exhaust.(ii) "Machinery and equipment" does not include: (A) Hand-powered tools; (B) property with a useful life of less than one year; (C) repair parts required to restore machinery and equipment to normal working order; (D) replacement parts that do not increase productivity, improve efficiency, or extend the useful life of machinery and equipment; (E) buildings; or (F) building fixtures that are not integral and necessary to the generation of electricity that are permanently affixed to and become a physical part of a building.(d) "Project labor agreement" and "community workforce agreement" means a prehire collective bargaining agreement with one or more labor organizations that establishes the terms and conditions of employment for a specific construction project and is an agreement described in 29 U.S.C. Sec. 158(f).(4)(a) Machinery and equipment is "used directly" in generating electricity by wind energy, solar energy, biomass energy, tidal or wave energy, geothermal resources, or technology that converts otherwise lost energy from exhaust if it provides any part of the process that captures the energy of the wind, sun, biomass energy, tidal or wave energy, geothermal resources, or technology that converts otherwise lost energy from exhaust, converts that energy to electricity, and stores, transforms, or transmits that electricity for entry into or operation in parallel with electric transmission and distribution systems.(b) Machinery and equipment is "used directly" in generating electricity by fuel cells if it provides any part of the process that captures the energy of the fuel, converts that energy to electricity, and stores, transforms, or transmits that electricity for entry into or operation in parallel with electric transmission and distribution systems.(5)(a)(i) A purchaser claiming an exemption in the form of a remittance under subsection (1)(b) or (c) of this section must pay the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 and all applicable local sales taxes imposed under the authority of chapters 82.14 and 81.104 RCW. The purchaser may then apply to the department for remittance in a form and manner prescribed by the department. A purchaser may not apply for a remittance under this section more frequently than once per quarter. The purchaser must specify the amount of exempted tax claimed and the qualifying purchases for which the exemption is claimed. The purchaser must retain, in adequate detail, records to enable the department to determine whether the purchaser is entitled to an exemption under this section, including: Invoices; proof of tax paid; and documents describing the machinery and equipment.(ii) The application for remittance must include a copy of the certificate issued for the project by the department of labor and industries as prescribed by rule under subsection (2) of this section.(b) The department must determine eligibility under this section based on the information provided by the purchaser, which is subject to audit verification by the department. The department must on a quarterly basis remit exempted amounts to qualifying purchasers who submitted applications during the previous quarter.(6)(a) Except as otherwise provided in (c) of this subsection, from October 1, 2017, through December 31, 2019, the exemption provided by this section does not apply to: (i) Machinery and equipment that is used directly in the generation of electricity using solar energy and capable of generating no more than five hundred kilowatts AC of electricity; or (ii) sales of or charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to installing such machinery and equipment.(b) The exemption provided by this section is reinstated for machinery and equipment for solar energy systems capable of generating more than one hundred kilowatts AC but no more than five hundred kilowatts AC of electricity, or sales of or charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to installing such machinery and equipment, if installation of the machinery and equipment commences on or after January 1, 2020.(c) The exemption provided by this section is reinstated for machinery and equipment for solar energy systems capable of generating no more than one hundred kilowatts AC of electricity, or sales of or charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to installing such machinery and equipment, if installation of the machinery and equipment commences on or after July 1, 2019.(7) This section expires January 1, 2030.Sec. 17. RCW 82.12.962 and 2019 c 288 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Subject to the requirements of this section, the tax imposed by RCW 82.12.020 does not apply to machinery and equipment used directly in generating electricity using fuel cells, wind, sun, biomass energy, tidal or wave energy, geothermal resources, or technology that converts otherwise lost energy from exhaust, or to labor and services rendered in respect to installing such machinery and equipment, but only if the purchaser develops with such machinery, equipment, and labor a facility capable of generating not less than one thousand watts AC of electricity. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the consumer must pay the state and local use tax on the use of such machinery and equipment and labor and services, and apply to the department for a remittance of the tax paid.(b) ((Beginning on July 1, 2011, through December 31, 2019, the amount of the exemption under this subsection (1) is equal to seventy-five percent of the state and local use tax paid. The consumer is eligible for an exemption under this subsection (1)(b) in the form of a remittance.))The exemption provided in (a) of this subsection does not apply to a sales and use tax imposed by a local government under the authority of chapter 82.14 or 81.104 RCW.(c) Beginning January 1, 2020, through December 31, 2029, the purchaser is entitled to an exemption, in the form of a remittance, under this subsection (1)(c) in an amount equal to:(i) Fifty percent of the state ((and local)) use tax paid, if:(A) The exempt purchase is for machinery and equipment or labor and services rendered in respect to installing such machinery and equipment in (a) of this subsection, excluding qualified purchases under (c)(i)(B) of this subsection, and the department of labor and industries certifies that the project includes: Procurement from and contracts with women, minority, or veteran-owned businesses; procurement from and contracts with entities that have a history of complying with federal and state wage and hour laws and regulations; apprenticeship utilization; and preferred entry for workers living in the area where the project is being constructed. In the event that a project is built without one or more of these standards, and a project developer or its designated principal contractor demonstrates that it has made all good faith efforts to meet the standards but was unable to comply due to lack of availability of qualified businesses or local hires, the department of labor and industries may certify that the developer complied with that standard; or(B) The exempt purchase is for machinery and equipment that is used directly in the generation of electricity by a solar energy system capable of generating more than one hundred kilowatts AC but no more than five hundred kilowatts AC of electricity, or labor and services rendered in respect to installing such machinery and equipment, and the department of labor and industries certifies that the project has met the requirements of (c)(i)(A) of this subsection, and the purchaser has provided the following documentation to the department as part of the application for a remittance:(I) A copy of the contractor's certificate of registration in compliance with chapter 18.27 RCW;(II) The contractor's current state unified business identifier number;(III) A copy of the contractor's proof of industrial insurance coverage for the contractor's employees working in Washington as required in Title 51 RCW; employment security department number as required in Title 50 RCW; and a state excise tax registration number as required in ((Title 82 RCW))this title; and(IV) Documentation of the contractor's history of compliance with federal and state wage and hour laws and regulations, consistent with (e)(ii)(D) of this subsection;(ii) Seventy-five percent of the state ((and local)) use tax paid, if the department of labor and industries certifies that the project complies with (c)(i)(A) of this subsection and compensates workers at prevailing wage rates determined by local collective bargaining as determined by the department of labor and industries. This subsection (1)(c)(ii) does not apply with respect to solar energy systems described in (c)(i)(B) of this subsection; or(iii) One hundred percent of the state ((and local)) use tax paid, if the department of labor and industries certifies that the project is developed under a community workforce agreement or project labor agreement. This subsection (1)(c)(iii) does not apply with respect to solar energy systems described in (c)(i)(B) of this subsection.(d) In order to qualify for the remittance under (c) of this subsection, installation of the qualifying machinery and equipment must commence no earlier than January 1, 2020, and be completed by December 31, 2029.(e) Beginning July 1, 2019, and through December 31, 2029, the consumer is entitled to an exemption under this subsection (1)(e) in an amount equal to one hundred percent of the state ((and local)) use tax due on:(i) Machinery and equipment that is used directly in the generation of electricity by a solar energy system that is capable of generating no more than one hundred kilowatts AC of electricity; or(ii) Labor and services rendered in respect to installing machinery and equipment exempt under (e)(i) of this subsection, and the seller meets the following requirements at the time of the purchase for which the exemption is claimed:(A) Has obtained a certificate of registration in compliance with chapter 18.27 RCW;(B) Has obtained a current state unified business identifier number;(C) Possesses proof of industrial insurance coverage for the contractor's employees working in Washington as required in Title 51 RCW; employment security department number as required in Title 50 RCW; and a state excise tax registration number as required in ((Title 82 RCW))this title; and(D) Has had no findings of violations of federal or state wage and hour laws and regulations in a final and binding order by an administrative agency or court of competent jurisdiction in the past twenty-four months.(f) In order to qualify for the exemption under (e)(ii) of this subsection, installation of the qualifying machinery and equipment must commence no earlier than July 1, 2019, and be completed by December 31, 2029.(2) The department of labor and industries must initiate an emergency rule making on May 7, 2019, to be completed by December 1, 2019, to:(a) Define and set minimum requirements for all labor standards identified in subsection (1)(c) of this section; and(b) Set requirements for all good faith efforts under subsection (1)(c)(i) and (ii) of this section, as well as documentation requirements and a certification process. Requirements for all good faith efforts must be designed to maximize the likelihood that the project is completed with said standards and could include: Proactive outreach to firms that are women, minority, and veteran-owned businesses; advertising in local community publications and publications appropriate to identified firms; participating in community job fairs, conferences, and trade shows; and other measures. The certification process and timeline must be designed to prevent undue delay to project development.(3)(a)(i) A person claiming an exemption in the form of a remittance under subsection (1)(b) and (c) of this section must pay the tax imposed by RCW 82.12.020 and all applicable local use taxes imposed under the authority of chapters 82.14 and 81.104 RCW. The consumer may then apply to the department for remittance in a form and manner prescribed by the department. A consumer may not apply for a remittance under this section more frequently than once per quarter. The consumer must specify the amount of exempted tax claimed and the qualifying purchases or acquisitions for which the exemption is claimed. The consumer must retain, in adequate detail, records to enable the department to determine whether the consumer is entitled to an exemption under this section, including: Invoices; proof of tax paid; and documents describing the machinery and equipment.(ii) The application for remittance must include a copy of the certificate issued for the project by the department of labor and industries under subsection (1) of this section.(b) The department must determine eligibility for remittances under this section based on the information provided by the consumer, which is subject to audit verification by the department. The department must on a quarterly basis remit exempted amounts to qualifying consumers who submitted applications during the previous quarter.(4) Purchases exempt under RCW 82.08.962 are also exempt from the tax imposed under RCW 82.12.020.(5) The definitions in RCW 82.08.962 apply to this section.(6) The exemption provided in subsection (1) of this section does not apply:(a) To machinery and equipment used directly in the generation of electricity using solar energy and capable of generating no more than five hundred kilowatts AC of electricity, or to sales of or charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to installing such machinery and equipment, when first use within this state of such machinery and equipment, or labor and services, occurs after September 30, 2017, and before January 1, 2020, except as otherwise provided in subsection (7) of this section; and(b) To any other machinery and equipment described in subsection (1)(a) of this section, or to sales of or charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to installing such machinery or equipment, when first use within this state of such machinery and equipment, or labor and services, occurs after December 31, 2029.(7)(a) The exemption provided by this section is reinstated for machinery and equipment for solar energy systems capable of generating more than one hundred kilowatts AC but no more than five hundred kilowatts AC of electricity, or sales of or charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to installing such machinery and equipment, if first use within the state of the machinery and equipment commences on or after January 1, 2020.(b) The exemption provided by this section is reinstated for machinery and equipment for solar energy systems capable of generating no more than one hundred kilowatts AC of electricity, or sales of or charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to installing such machinery and equipment, if first use within the state of the machinery and equipment commences on or after July 1, 2019.(8) This section expires January 1, 2030.Sec. 18. RCW 82.08.986 and 2025 c 411 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) An exemption from the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 is provided for sales to qualifying businesses and to qualifying tenants of eligible server equipment to be installed, without intervening use, in an eligible computer data center to which a valid exemption certificate applies, and to charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to installing eligible server equipment.(b) This exemption also applies to sales to qualifying businesses and to qualifying tenants of eligible power infrastructure, including labor and services rendered in respect to constructing, installing, repairing, altering, or improving eligible power infrastructure at an eligible computer data center for which an exemption certificate has been issued.(c) The exemption provided in (a) of this subsection does not apply to a sales and use tax imposed by a local government under the authority of chapter 82.14 or 81.104 RCW.(d) No new exemption certificates may be issued on or after July 1, 2036.(((d)))(e) The exemptions provided in this section expire July 1, 2048.(((e)))(f) Each calendar year, the department may issue no more than six certificates for data centers which qualify through refurbishment. Certificates are available for refurbished data centers on a first-in-time basis based on the date the application required under this section is received by the department. Each qualifying business may apply for only one certificate for a refurbished data center each calendar year.(2)(a) In order to obtain an exemption certificate under this section, a qualifying business or a qualifying tenant must submit an application to the department for an exemption certificate. The application must include the information necessary, as required by the department, to determine that a business or tenant qualifies for the exemption under this section. The department must issue exemption certificates to qualifying businesses and qualifying tenants. The department may assign a unique identification number to each exemption certificate issued under this section.(b) A qualifying business or a qualifying tenant claiming the exemption under this section must present the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.(c) With respect to computer data centers for which the commencement of construction occurs after July 1, 2015, but before July 1, 2019, the exemption provided in this section is limited to no more than eight computer data centers, with total eligible data centers provided under this section limited to 12 from July 1, 2015, through June 9, 2022. Tenants of qualified data centers do not constitute additional data centers under the limit. The exemption is available on a first-in-time basis based on the date the application required under this section is received by the department.(d) The exemption certificate is effective on the date the application is received by the department, which is deemed to be the date of issuance. Only purchases on or after the date of issuance qualify for the exemption under this section. No tax refunds are authorized for purchases made before the effective date of the exemption certificate.(e) Exemption certificates expire two years after the date of issuance, unless construction has been commenced.(3)(a)(i) Within six years of the date that the department issued an exemption certificate under this section to a qualifying business or a qualifying tenant with respect to an eligible computer data center, the qualifying business or qualifying tenant must establish that net employment assigned to an eligible computer data center has increased by a minimum of:(A) Thirty-five family wage employment positions; or, if lower(B) Three family wage employment positions for each 20,000 square feet of space or less that is newly dedicated to housing working servers at the eligible computer data center. For qualifying tenants, the number of family wage employment positions that must be increased under this subsection (3)(a)(i)(B) is based only on the space occupied by the qualifying tenant in the eligible computer data center.(ii) After the minimum number of family wage employment positions as required under (a)(i) of this subsection (3) is established, a qualifying business or a qualifying tenant must maintain the minimum family wage employment positions required under (a)(i) of this subsection (3) while the exemption certificate is valid.(b) In calculating the net increase in family wage employment positions:(i) The owner of an eligible computer data center, in addition to its own net increase in family wage employment positions, may include:(A) The net increase, since the date of issuance of the qualifying business's exemption certificate, in family wage employment positions employed by qualifying tenants; and(B) The net increase in family wage employment positions described in (c)(ii)(B) of this subsection (3).(ii)(A) Qualifying tenants, in addition to their own net increase in family wage employment positions, may include:(I) A portion of the net increase in family wage employment positions employed by the owner; and(II) A portion of the net increase in family wage employment positions described in (c)(ii)(B) of this subsection (3).(B) The portion of the net increase in family wage employment positions to be counted under this subsection (3)(b)(ii) by each qualifying tenant is equal to the net increase in family wage employment positions assigned to an eligible computer data center as described in (b)(ii)(A)(I) and (II) of this subsection (3), multiplied by the percentage of total space within the eligible computer data center occupied by the qualifying tenant. Any combination of qualifying business and qualifying tenant family wage employment positions may meet this requirement.(C)(I) In the instance of an existing data center facility that was ineligible, regardless of the date of commencement of construction, that later obtains an exemption certificate under this section, the data center may count the existing employment positions that are dedicated to the data center toward the new family wage employment position requirements if the employment positions meet the requirements of a family wage employment position, as described in (c)(i)(B) and (C) of this subsection (3), other than the requirement that the position did not exist or had not previously been filled as of the date that the department issued an exemption certificate.(II) In the instance of the refurbishment of an existing data center that previously qualified under the data center program, the data center may count the existing employment positions dedicated to the data center toward the new family wage employment position requirements if the employment positions meet the requirements of a family wage employment position, as described in (c)(i)(B) and (C) of this subsection (3), other than the requirement that the position did not exist or had not previously been filled as of the date that the department issued an exemption certificate.(c)(i) For purposes of this subsection:(A) For exemption certificates issued before June 9, 2022, family wage employment positions are new permanent employment positions requiring 40 hours of weekly work, or their equivalent, on a full-time basis assigned to an eligible computer data center and receiving a wage equivalent to or greater than 150 percent of the per capita personal income of the county in which the qualified project is located as published by the employment security department. The per capita personal income to be used to determine qualification for any year is the amount that was established for the immediate prior year.(B) For exemption certificates issued on or after June 9, 2022, family wage employment positions are new permanent employment positions requiring 40 hours of weekly work, or their equivalent, on a full-time basis assigned to an eligible computer data center and receiving a wage equivalent to or greater than 125 percent of the per capita personal income of the county in which the qualified project is located as published by the employment security department. The per capita personal income to be used to determine qualification for any year is the amount that was established for the immediate prior year.(C) An employment position may not be counted as a family wage employment position unless the employment position is entitled to health insurance coverage provided by the employer of the employment position.(D) "New permanent employment position" means an employment position that did not exist or that had not previously been filled as of the date that the department issued an exemption certificate to the qualifying business or qualifying tenant of an eligible computer data center, as the case may be, except as provided in (b)(ii)(C) of this subsection (3).(ii)(A) Family wage employment positions include positions filled by employees of the qualifying business and by employees of qualifying tenants.(B) Family wage employment positions also include individuals performing work at an eligible computer data center as an independent contractor hired by the owner of the eligible computer data center or as an employee of an independent contractor hired by the owner of the eligible computer data center, if the work is necessary for the operation of the computer data center, such as security and building maintenance, and provided that all of the applicable requirements in (c)(i) of this subsection (3) are met.(d)(i) For a qualifying business or qualifying tenant that does not meet the requirements of this subsection (3), previously exempted sales and use taxes are immediately due and payable and any exemption certificate issued to that qualifying business or qualifying tenant under this section is canceled, except as described in (d)(iii) of this subsection (3).(ii) The department of labor and industries must, at the request of the department, assist in determining whether the requirements of this subsection (3) have been met.(iii) If the department, with the assistance of the department of labor and industries, finds that a failure to meet the requirements of this subsection (3) is due to circumstances beyond the control of the qualifying business or qualifying tenant including, but not limited to, a declaration of an economic recession, pandemic, or natural disaster affecting data center operations, the department may provide exceptions or extensions to the requirements of this subsection (3).(iv) Any repayment of taxes triggered by the failure of a qualifying business or qualifying tenant to meet the requirements of this subsection (3) must be calculated in proportion to the duration of time for which any applicable requirement was not met.(v) If the department is notified that a qualifying business or qualifying tenant fails to meet the requirements of this subsection (3), the department may require a qualifying business or qualifying tenant to submit records necessary to determine whether the requirements have been met.(4) For exemption certificates issued on or after June 9, 2022:(a) Within three years after being placed in service, the qualifying business operating a newly constructed data center must certify to the department that it has attained certification under one or more of the following sustainable design or green building standards:(i) BREEAM for new construction or BREEAM in-use;(ii) Energy star;(iii) Envision;(iv) ISO 50001-energy management;(v) LEED for building design and construction or LEED for operations and maintenance;(vi) Green globes for new construction or green globes for existing buildings;(vii) UL 3223; or(viii) Other reasonable standards approved by the department.(b) The department may require qualifying businesses and qualifying tenants to submit records necessary to verify the requirements under (a) of this subsection have been met.(c)(i) For a qualifying business or qualifying tenant that does not meet the requirements of (a) of this subsection (4), all previously exempted sales and use taxes may be immediately due and payable, any exemption certificate issued to that qualifying business or qualifying tenant under this section is canceled, and an additional 10 percent penalty is assessed, except as described in (c)(ii) of this subsection (4).(ii) If the department finds that a failure to meet the requirements of this subsection (4) is due to circumstances beyond the control of the qualifying business or qualifying tenant including, but not limited to, a declaration of an economic recession, pandemic, or natural disaster affecting data center operations, the department may, at its discretion, provide exceptions or extensions to the requirements of this subsection (4). The department may, at its discretion, coordinate with agencies with relevant expertise to assist in determining whether the requirements have been met.(5) A qualifying business or a qualifying tenant claiming the exemption under this section is encouraged to take direct steps to adopt practices to mitigate negative environmental impacts resulting from expanded use of data centers, including through:(a) Coordinating with the industrial waste coordination program established under RCW 43.31.625 to identify and provide technical assistance in implementing industrial symbiosis projects;(b) To the extent possible, procuring or contracting for power from renewable sources;(c) Adopting practices to improve the energy efficiency of existing data centers, including through upgrading and consolidating technology, managing data center airflow, and adjusting and improving heating, ventilation, and air conditioning systems; and(d) Taking actions to conserve, reuse, and replace water. This includes using water efficient fixtures and practices; treating, infiltrating, and harvesting rainwater; recycling water before discharging; partnering with local water utilities to use discharged water for irrigation and other water conservation purposes; using reclaimed water where possible for data center operations; and supporting water restoration in local watersheds.(6) A qualifying business or a qualifying tenant claiming an exemption under this section or RCW 82.12.986 must complete an annual tax performance report with the department as required under RCW 82.32.534. The report must identify construction firm names and employment levels used for constructing, renovating, refurbishing, or remodeling the data centers.(7)(a) The certificate holder may not at any time assign or transfer a certificate without the prior written consent of the department. The department must allow certificate transfers if the certificate holder meets the following requirements:(i) The certificate assignee or transferee is qualified to do business in the state;(ii) The assignee or transferee acknowledges the transfer of the certificate in writing;(iii) The assignee or transferee agrees to keep and perform all the terms of the certificates; and(iv) An assignment or transfer of the certificate is to an entity that:(A) Controls, is controlled by, or under common control with, the certificate holder;(B) Acquires all or substantially all of the stock or assets of the certificate holder; or(C) Is the resulting entity of a merger or consolidation with the certificate holder.(b) In the event the assignee or transferee acquires eligible server equipment in a qualifying asset sale under (a)(iv)(B) of this subsection, the purchaser shall be deemed to purchase the eligible server equipment pursuant to the transferred certificate.(8) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(a) "Affiliated" means that one person has a direct or indirect ownership interest of at least 20 percent in another person.(b) "Building" means a fully enclosed structure with a weather resistant exterior wall envelope or concrete or masonry walls designed in accordance with the requirements for structures under chapter 19.27 RCW. This definition of "building" only applies to computer data centers for which commencement of construction occurs on or after July 1, 2015.(c) "Certificate of occupancy" means:(i) For a newly constructed eligible computer data center, the certificate of occupancy issued by a local governing authority for the structure or structures which comprise the eligible computer data center; or(ii) For renovations of an eligible computer data center, the certificate of occupancy issued by a local governing authority for the renovated structure or structures that comprise the eligible computer data center.(d)(i) "Computer data center" means a facility comprised of one or more buildings, which may be comprised of multiple businesses, constructed or refurbished specifically, and used primarily, to house working servers, where the facility has the following characteristics: (A) Uninterruptible power supplies, generator backup power, or both; (B) sophisticated fire suppression and prevention systems; and (C) enhanced physical security, such as: Restricted access to the facility to selected personnel; permanent security guards; video camera surveillance; an electronic system requiring passcodes, keycards, or biometric scans, such as hand scans and retinal or fingerprint recognition; or similar security features.(ii) For a computer data center comprised of multiple buildings, each separate building constructed or refurbished specifically, and used primarily, to house working servers is considered a computer data center if it has all of the characteristics listed in (d)(i)(A) through (C) of this subsection (8).(iii) A facility comprised of one building or more than one building must have a combined square footage of at least 100,000 square feet.(e) "Electronic data storage and data management services" include, but are not limited to: Providing data storage and backup services, providing computer processing power, hosting enterprise software applications, and hosting websites. The term also includes providing services such as email, web browsing and searching, media applications, and other online services, regardless of whether a charge is made for such services.(f)(i) "Eligible computer data center" means a computer data center:(A) Located in a rural county as defined in RCW 82.14.370 at the time an application for an exemption under this section is received;(B) Having at least 20,000 square feet dedicated to housing working servers; and(C) For which the commencement of construction occurs:(I) After March 31, 2010, and before July 1, 2011;(II) After March 31, 2012, and before July 1, 2015; or(III) After June 30, 2015, and before July 1, 2035.(ii) For purposes of this section, "commencement of construction" means the date that a building permit is issued under the building code adopted under RCW 19.27.031 for construction of the computer data center. The construction of a computer data center includes the expansion, renovation, or refurbishment of existing facilities regardless of whether the existing facility was previously ineligible and regardless of whether commencement of construction of the existing facility occurred outside of the dates listed in (f)(i)(C)(I) through (III) of this subsection, including leased or rented space. "Commencement of construction" does not include soil testing, site clearing and grading, site preparation, or any other related activities that are initiated before the issuance of a building permit for the construction of the foundation of a computer data center. If no building permit is required for renovation or refurbishment, then the date that renovation or refurbishment begins is the "commencement of construction."(g) "Eligible power infrastructure" means all fixtures and equipment owned by a qualifying business or qualifying tenant and necessary for the transformation, distribution, or management of electricity that is required to operate eligible server equipment within an eligible computer data center. The term includes generators; wiring; cogeneration equipment; and associated fixtures and equipment, such as electrical switches, batteries, and distribution, testing, and monitoring equipment. The term does not include substations.(h) "Eligible server equipment" means:(i) For a qualifying business whose computer data center qualifies as an eligible computer data center under (f)(i)(C)(I) of this subsection (8), the original server equipment installed in an eligible computer data center on or after April 1, 2010, and before January 1, 2026, and replacement server equipment. For purposes of this subsection (8)(h)(i), "replacement server equipment" means server equipment that:(A) Replaces existing server equipment, if the sale or use of the server equipment to be replaced qualified for an exemption under this section or RCW 82.12.986; and(B) Is installed and put into regular use before April 1, 2018.(ii) For a qualifying business whose computer data center qualifies as an eligible computer data center under (f)(i)(C)(II) of this subsection (8), "eligible server equipment" means the original server equipment installed in an eligible computer data center on or after April 1, 2012, and before January 1, 2026, and replacement server equipment. For purposes of this subsection (8)(h)(ii), "replacement server equipment" means server equipment that:(A) Replaces existing server equipment, if the sale or use of the server equipment to be replaced qualified for an exemption under this section or RCW 82.12.986; and(B) Is installed and put into regular use before April 1, 2024.(iii) For a qualifying business whose computer data center qualifies as an eligible computer data center under (f)(i)(C)(III) of this subsection (8), "eligible server equipment" means the original server equipment installed in a building within an eligible computer data center on or after July 1, 2015, and replacement server equipment. Server equipment installed in movable or fixed stand-alone, prefabricated, or modular units, including intermodal shipping containers, is not "directly installed in a building." For purposes of this subsection (8)(h)(iii), "replacement server equipment" means server equipment that:(A)(I) Replaces existing server equipment, if the sale or use of the server equipment to be replaced qualified for an exemption under this section or RCW 82.12.986; or(II) Replaces existing server equipment in a computer data center that meets the following requirements: Was ineligible before June 9, 2022, for the exemptions provided under this section and RCW 82.12.986; has been refurbished; and to which a valid exemption certificate applies; and(B) Is installed and put into regular use no later than 12 years after the date of the certificate of occupancy or completion of refurbishment of the computer data center.(iv) For a qualifying tenant who leases space within an eligible computer data center, "eligible server equipment" means the original server equipment installed within the space it leases from an eligible computer data center with an exemption certificate on or after April 1, 2010, and replacement server equipment. For purposes of this subsection (8)(h)(iv), "replacement server equipment" means server equipment that:(A)(I) Replaces existing server equipment, if the sale or use of the server equipment to be replaced qualified for an exemption under this section or RCW 82.12.986; or(II) Replaces existing server equipment in a computer data center that meets the following requirements: Was ineligible before June 9, 2022, for the exemptions provided under this section and RCW 82.12.986; has been refurbished; and to which a valid exemption certificate applies; and(B) Is installed and put into regular use no later than 12 years after the date of the certificate of occupancy or completion of refurbishment of the computer data center.(i) "Qualifying business" means a business entity that exists for the primary purpose of engaging in commercial activity for profit and that is the owner of an eligible computer data center. The term does not include the state or federal government or any of their departments, agencies, and institutions; tribal governments; political subdivisions of this state; or any municipal, quasi-municipal, public, or other corporation created by the state or federal government, tribal government, municipality, or political subdivision of the state.(j) "Qualifying tenant" means a business entity that exists for the primary purpose of engaging in commercial activity for profit and that leases space from a qualifying business within an eligible computer data center. The term does not include the state or federal government or any of their departments, agencies, and institutions; tribal governments; political subdivisions of this state; or any municipal, quasi-municipal, public, or other corporation created by the state or federal government, tribal government, municipality, or political subdivision of the state. The term also does not include a lessee of space in an eligible computer data center under (f)(i)(C)(I) of this subsection (8), if the lessee and lessor are affiliated and:(i) That space will be used by the lessee to house server equipment that replaces server equipment previously installed and operated in that eligible computer data center by the lessor or another person affiliated with the lessee; or(ii) Prior to May 2, 2012, the primary use of the server equipment installed in that eligible computer data center was to provide electronic data storage and data management services for the business purposes of either the lessor, persons affiliated with the lessor, or both.(k)(i) "Refurbished" or "refurbishment" means a substantial improvement to an eligible computer data center to update or modernize servers, server space, ventilation, or power infrastructure in an eligible computer data center.(ii) For a qualifying computer data center to be considered refurbished, the qualifying business must certify, in a form and manner prescribed by the department, that the refurbishment of an eligible computer data center is complete. The refurbishment is considered complete on the date that the improved portion of the computer data center is operationally complete and able to be used for its intended purpose.(l) "Server equipment" means the computer hardware located in an eligible computer data center and used exclusively to provide electronic data storage and data management services, including cloud services, for internal use by the owner or lessee of the computer data center, for clients of the owner or lessee of the computer data center, or both. "Server equipment" also includes computer software necessary to operate the computer hardware. "Server equipment" does not include personal computers, the racks upon which the server equipment is installed, and computer peripherals such as keyboards, monitors, printers, and mice.(9) This section expires July 1, 2048.Sec. 19. RCW 82.12.986 and 2022 c 267 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) An exemption from the tax imposed by RCW 82.12.020 is provided for the use by qualifying businesses or qualifying tenants of eligible server equipment to be installed, without intervening use, in an eligible computer data center for which an exemption certificate under RCW 82.08.986 has been issued, and to the use of labor and services rendered in respect to installing such server equipment.(b) Until July 1, 2048, this exemption also applies to the use by a qualifying business or qualifying tenant of eligible power infrastructure, including labor and services rendered in respect to installing, repairing, altering, or improving such infrastructure at an eligible computer data center for which an exemption certificate under RCW 82.08.986 has been issued.(c) The exemptions provided in this section expire July 1, 2048.(d) The exemption provided in (a) of this subsection does not apply to a sales and use tax imposed by a local government under the authority of chapter 82.14 or 81.104 RCW.(2) A qualifying business or a qualifying tenant is not eligible for the exemption under this section unless the department issued an exemption certificate to the qualifying business or a qualifying tenant for the exemption provided in RCW 82.08.986.(3) The definitions and requirements in RCW 82.08.986 apply to this section.(4) The exemption provided in subsection (1) of this section does not apply to the use of eligible server equipment and eligible power infrastructure, and the labor and services provided in subsection (1) of this section, if first used by qualifying businesses or qualifying tenants on or after July 1, 2048.(5) This section expires July 1, 2053.Sec. 20. RCW 82.08.975 and 2013 3rd sp.s. c 2 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of computer hardware, computer peripherals, or software, not otherwise eligible for exemption under RCW 82.08.02565, used primarily in the development, design, and engineering of aerospace products or in providing aerospace services, or to sales of or charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to installing the computer hardware, computer peripherals, or software.(b) The exemption provided in (a) of this subsection does not apply to a sales and use tax imposed by a local government under the authority of chapter 82.14 or 81.104 RCW.(2) The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context requires otherwise.(a) "Aerospace products" means:(i) Commercial airplanes and their components;(ii) Machinery and equipment that is designed and used primarily for the maintenance, repair, overhaul, or refurbishing of commercial airplanes or their components by federal aviation regulation part 145 certificated repair stations; and(iii) Tooling specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or their components.(b) "Aerospace services" means the maintenance, repair, overhaul, or refurbishing of commercial airplanes or their components, but only when such services are performed by a FAR part 145 certificated repair station.(c) "Commercial airplane" and "component" have the same meanings provided in RCW 82.32.550.(d) "Peripherals" includes keyboards, monitors, mouse devices, and other accessories that operate outside of the computer, excluding cables, conduit, wiring, and other similar property.(4) This section expires July 1, 2040.Sec. 21. RCW 82.12.975 and 2013 3rd sp.s. c 2 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use of computer hardware, computer peripherals, or software, not otherwise eligible for exemption under RCW 82.12.02565, used primarily in the development, design, and engineering of aerospace products or in providing aerospace services, or to the use of labor and services rendered in respect to installing the computer hardware, computer peripherals, or software.(b) The exemption provided in (a) of this subsection does not apply to a sales and use tax imposed by a local government under the authority of chapter 82.14 or 81.104 RCW.(2) As used in this section, "peripherals," "aerospace products," and "aerospace services" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 82.08.975.(3) This section expires July 1, 2040.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 22. The legislature intends to evaluate the effectiveness of removing the local sales tax exemption on certain products and services on the fiscal health of local governments within three years of the effective date of this section. The legislature also intends to consider the impacts on other stated legislative intent related to each tax preference.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 23. Section 7 of this act expires January 1, 2034.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 24. Section 8 of this act takes effect January 1, 2034.--- END ---